Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-377
Legitimacy of children.

Children born to the parties, or to either spouse, in a marriage relationship which may be dissolved or annulled pursuant to sections 42-347 to 42-381 shall be legitimate unless otherwise decreed by the court, and in every case the legitimacy of all children conceived before the commencement of the suit shall be presumed until the contrary is shown.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB427, § 1.

The presumption favoring legitimacy of children may only be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence beyond the testimony of husband or wife denying child's legitimacy. Perkins v. Perkins, 198 Neb. 401, 253 N.W.2d 42 (1977).

Presumed legitimacy of children born in wedlock may not be rebutted by the testimony or declaration of a parent. Ford v. Ford, 191 Neb. 548, 216 N.W.2d 176 (1974).

This section does not create an irrebuttable presumption of legitimacy in the case of children conceived before the commencement of the dissolution action. Cavanaugh v. deBaudiniere, 1 Neb. App. 204, 493 N.W.2d 197 (1992).